Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.46
Manufacturing, defined.

Manufacturing means an action or series of actions performed upon tangible personal property, either by hand or machine, which results in that tangible personal property being reduced or transformed into a different state, quality, form, property, or thing. Manufacturing does not include retail operations, the generation or transmission of electricity, the production or transmission of information, programming, or data, the preparation of food for immediate consumption, or the purification or transportation of water.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 8.